Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201621-233
Registered office and registered agent.

(MBCA 5.01) Each corporation
must continuously maintain in this state:

(1) A registered office
that may be the same as any of its places of business; and

(2) A registered agent,
who may be:

(i)
An individual who resides in this state and whose business office is identical
with the registered office; or

(ii) A domestic or foreign corporation or other eligible
entity whose business office is identical with the registered office and,
in the case of a foreign corporation or foreign eligible entity, is authorized
to transact business in the state.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 33.